Washington statutes.
RCW 26.55.050

Immunity from civil and criminal liability.

The state, state agency, local governmental agency, law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, clerk of court, and state or local governmental official acting in an official capacity are immune from civil and criminal liability for an act or omission arising out of the filing or recognition and enforcement of a Canadian domestic violence protection order or the detention or arrest of an alleged violator of a Canadian domestic violence protection order if the act or omission was a good faith effort to comply with this chapter.

[ 2021 c 215 s 85; 2019 c 263 s 906.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.